Connecticut, session 2026, SB00389.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-3mm of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Labor Department, within available appropriations, shall
establish a program to distribute youth employment and training funds
to regional workforce development boards for services to persons ages
fourteen to twenty-four.
(b) Funds provided for in this section shall be allocated [as follows:
(1) Thirty-two and five-tenths per cent to Capitol Workforce Partners;
(2) twenty-two and five-tenths per cent to The Workforce Alliance; (3)
twelve and five-tenths per cent to The Workplace, Inc.; (4) twenty-two
and five-tenths per cent to the Northwest Regional Workforce
Investment Board, Inc.; and (5) ten per cent to the Eastern Connecticut
Workforce Investment Board] to the regional workforce development
boards by the Labor Commissioner based on a formula established by
the Labor Commissioner, in collaboration with the regional workforce
development boards, that utilizes available data, including, but not
limited to, (1) the number of students in each workforce development
region that are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch, (2) the number
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 389
of economically disadvantaged youth in each workforce development
region determined by the most recent American Community Survey
conducted by United States Census Bureau, and (3) the number of at-
risk students, as defined in section 21 of public act 24-45, in each
workforce development region.
(c) The Labor Commissioner, in collaboration with the regional
workforce development boards, may update the formula established
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section in order to reflect current
conditions in the workforce development regions.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 31-3mm
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2